pt-BR: Recursos de iluminação de efeitos especiais compatíveis: Brilho ajustável/dimerização; Velocidade ajustável; Programas automáticos; Modo luz negra; Microfone integrado; Conexão DMX em cascata; Alimentação em cascata; Modo de projeção de gobo; Gestão de calor (resfriamento por ventoinha); Conexão mestre/escravo; Controle por app móvel; Rotação motorizada; Sincronização de várias unidades; Sincronização com música; Modo ativado por som; Modo estático; Modo estroboscópico; Timer/agendamento; Controle remoto sem fio incluído; Outro
th: คุณสมบัติแสงเอฟเฟกต์พิเศษที่ใช้งานร่วมกันได้: ปรับความสว่าง/หรี่ไฟได้; ปรับความเร็วได้; โปรแกรมอัตโนมัติ; โหมดแบล็กไลต์; ไมโครโฟนในตัว; DMX แบบเดซีเชน; พลังงานแบบเดซีเชน; โหมดการฉาย Gobo; การจัดการความร้อน (ระบายความร้อนด้วยพัดลม); การเชื่อมโยง Master/Slave; ควบคุมผ่านแอปมือถือ; การหมุนด้วยมอเตอร์; การซิงค์หลายอุปกรณ์; ซิงค์กับเสียงเพลง; โหมดสั่งงานด้วยเสียง; โหมดคงที่; โหมดไฟกะพริบ; ตัวจับเวลา/ตัวจัดตารางเวลา; มีรีโมทไร้สาย; อื่นๆ
sv: Kompatibla funktioner för specialeffektbelysning: Justerbar ljusstyrka/dimning; Justerbar hastighet; Autoprogram; Blacklight-läge; Inbyggd mikrofon; Daisy chain-DMX; Daisy chain-ström; Gobo-projektionsläge; Värmehantering (fläktkyld); Master/slav-länkning; Mobilappskontroll; Motoriserad rotation; Synkronisering av flera enheter; Musiksynkronisering; Ljudaktiverat läge; Statiskt läge; Stroboskop-läge; Timer/schemaläggning; Trådlös fjärrkontroll ingår; Övrigt
nl: Compatibele functies voor speciale-effectverlichting: Aanpasbare helderheid/dimmen; Aanpasbare snelheid; Automatische programma's; Blacklight-modus; Ingebouwde microfoon; Daisy-chain DMX; Daisy-chain stroom; Gobo-projectiemodus; Warmtebeheer (ventilatorgekoeld); Master/slave-koppeling; Bediening via mobiele app; Gemotoriseerde rotatie; Synchronisatie van meerdere units; Muzieksynchronisatie; Geluidsgeactiveerde modus; Statische modus; Stroboscoopmodus; Timer/planner; Inclusief draadloze afstandsbediening; Overige
en: Compatible special effects lighting features: Adjustable brightness/dimming; Adjustable speed; Auto programs; Blacklight mode; Built-in microphone; Daisy-chain DMX; Daisy-chain power; Gobo projection mode; Heat management (fan-cooled); Master/slave linking; Mobile app control; Motorized rotation; Multi-unit synchronization; Music sync; Sound-activated mode; Static mode; Strobe mode; Timer/scheduler; Wireless remote included; Other
zh-CN: 适配特效灯光功能特性: 亮度可调/调光; 速度可调; 自动程序; 黑光灯模式; 内置麦克风; 菊花链 DMX; 菊花链电源; 图案灯投影模式; 热管理（风扇冷却）; 主/从连接; 移动应用控制; 电动旋转; 多台设备同步; 音乐同步; 声控模式; 静态模式; 频闪模式; 定时器/调度程序; 包含无线遥控器; 其他
sl-SI: Združljive funkcije osvetlitve za posebne učinke: Nastavljiva svetlost/zatemnitev; Nastavljiva hitrost; Samodejni programi; Način UV-svetlobe; Vgrajen mikrofon; Veriženje DMX; Verižno napajanje; Način projekcije Gobo; Upravljanje toplote (hlajenje z ventilatorjem); Povezovanje Master/Slave; Upravljanje prek mobilne aplikacije; Motorizirana rotacija; Sinhronizacija več enot; Sinhronizacija z glasbo; Zvočno aktiviran način; Statični način; Način stroboskopa; Časovnik/urnik; Priložen brezžični daljinski upravljalnik; Drugo
tr: Uyumlu özel efektli aydınlatma özellikleri: Ayarlanabilir parlaklık/karartma; Ayarlanabilir hız; Otomatik programlar; Siyah ışık modu; Dahili mikrofon; Papatya dizimi DMX; Papatya dizimi güç; Gobo projeksiyon modu; Isı yönetimi (fan soğutmalı); Ana/bağımlı bağlantısı; Mobil uygulama kontrolü; Motorlu dönüş; Çoklu ünite senkronizasyonu; Müzik senkronizasyonu; Sese duyarlı mod; Statik mod; Çakar modu; Zamanlayıcı/planlayıcı; Kablosuz kumanda dahildir; Diğer
es: Funciones de iluminación de efectos especiales compatibles: Brillo ajustable/atenuación; Velocidad ajustable; Programas automáticos; Modo de luz negra; Micrófono integrado; Conexión en cadena DMX; Conexión de energía en cadena; Modo de proyección de gobo; Control de temperatura (enfriamiento por ventilador); Conexión maestro/esclavo; Control por app móvil; Rotación motorizada; Sincronización de múltiples unidades; Sincronización con música; Modo activado por sonido; Modo estático; Modo estroboscópico; Temporizador/programador; Control remoto inalámbrico incluido; Otro
lt-LT: Suderinamos specialiųjų efektų apšvietimo funkcijos: Reguliuojamas ryškumas / pritemdymas; Reguliuojamas greitis; Automatinės programos; UV šviesos režimas; Integruotas mikrofonas; Nuoseklusis DMX jungimas; Nuoseklusis maitinimo jungimas; Gobo projekcijos režimas; Šilumos valdymas (aušinama ventiliatoriumi); Pagrindinio / pavaldaus įrenginio susiejimas; Valdymas mobiliąja programėle; Motorizuotas sukimasis; Kelių įrenginių sinchronizavimas; Sinchronizavimas su muzika; Garsu aktyvinamas režimas; Statinis režimas; Stroboskopo režimas; Laikmatis / planuoklis; Pridedamas belaidis nuotolinio valdymo pultas; Kita
nb: Kompatible spesialeffektbelysningsfunksjoner: Justerbar lysstyrke/dimming; Justerbar hastighet; Autoprogrammer; Blacklight-modus; Innebygd mikrofon; Seriekoblet DMX; Seriekoblet strøm; Gobo-projeksjonsmodus; Varmestyring (viftekjølt); Master/slave-kobling; Kontroll via mobilapp; Motorisert rotasjon; Flerenhetssynkronisering; Musikksynkronisering; Lydaktivert modus; Statisk modus; Strobemodus; Timer/planlegger; Trådløs fjernkontroll inkludert; Annet
pl: Kompatybilne funkcje oświetlenia efektów specjalnych: Regulacja jasności/ściemnianie; Regulacja prędkości; Programy automatyczne; Tryb UV (Blacklight); Wbudowany mikrofon; Połączenie szeregowe DMX (daisy-chain); Połączenie szeregowe zasilania; Tryb projekcji gobo; Odprowadzanie ciepła (chłodzenie wentylatorem); Łączenie Master/Slave; Sterowanie przez aplikację mobilną; Obrót zmotoryzowany; Synchronizacja wielu urządzeń; Synchronizacja z muzyką; Tryb aktywacji dźwiękiem; Tryb statyczny; Tryb stroboskopowy; Harmonogram/Timer; Bezprzewodowy pilot w zestawie; Inne
ko: 호환 특수 효과 조명 기능: 밝기 조절/디밍; 속도 조절; 자동 프로그램; 블랙라이트 모드; 내장형 마이크; 데이지 체인 DMX; 데이지 체인 전원; 고보 프로젝션 모드; 열 관리(팬 냉각식); 마스터/슬레이브 연결; 모바일 앱 제어; 전동 회전; 다중 장치 동기화; 음악 동기화; 사운드 반응 모드; 스태틱 모드; 스트로보 모드; 타이머/스케줄러; 무선 리모컨 포함; 기타
da: Kompatible specialeffekt-lysfunktioner: Justerbar lysstyrke/dæmpning; Justerbar hastighed; Autoprogrammer; Blacklight-tilstand; Indbygget mikrofon; Daisy-chain DMX; Daisy-chain strøm; Gobo-projektionstilstand; Varmestyring (ventilatorkølet); Master/slave-forbindelse; Styring via mobilapp; Motoriseret rotation; Synkronisering af flere enheder; Musiksynkronisering; Lydaktiveret tilstand; Statisk tilstand; Strobetilstand; Timer/tidsplan; Trådløs fjernbetjening medfølger; Andet
pt-PT: Características de iluminação de efeitos especiais compatíveis: Brilho/obscurecimento ajustáveis; Velocidade ajustável; Programas automáticos; Modo de luz negra; Microfone integrado; DMX encadeado; Alimentação encadeada; Modo de projeção Gobo; Gestão térmica (arrefecimento por ventoinha); Ligação principal/secundária; Controlo por app para dispositivos móveis; Rotação motorizada; Sincronização de várias unidades; Sincronização com música; Modo ativado por som; Modo estático; Modo estroboscópico; Temporizador/programador; Comando sem fios incluído; Outra
it: Illuminazione per effetti speciali compatibile: Luminosità regolabile/dimmerabile; Velocità regolabile; Programmi automatici; Modalità luce nera; Microfono integrato; Collegamento in cascata DMX; Collegamento in cascata per alimentazione; Modalità proiezione gobo; Gestione del calore (raffreddamento a ventola); Collegamento master/slave; Controllo da app mobile; Rotazione motorizzata; Sincronizzazione multi-unità; Sincronizzazione musicale; Modalità ad attivazione sonora; Modalità statica; Modalità stroboscopica; Timer/programmatore; Telecomando wireless incluso; Altro
de: Kompatible Spezialeffekt-Beleuchtungsfunktionen: Anpassbare Helligkeit/Dimmung; Einstellbare Geschwindigkeit; Auto-Programme; Schwarzlichtmodus; Integriertes Mikrofon; Daisy-Chain-DMX; Durchschleifbare Stromversorgung; Gobo-Projektionsmodus; Wärmemanagement (lüftergekühlt); Master/Slave-Kopplung; Steuerung per mobiler App; Motorisierte Rotation; Synchronisation mehrerer Geräte; Musiksynchronisation; Musikgesteuerter Modus; Statischer Modus; Stroboskopmodus; Timer/Zeitplaner; Inklusive kabelloser Fernbedienung; Sonstige
fi: Yhteensopivat erikoistehosteen valaistusominaisuudet: Säädettävä kirkkaus / himmennys; Säädettävä nopeus; Automaattiohjelmat; Mustavalotila; Sisäänrakennettu mikrofoni; Ketjutettava DMX; Ketjutettava virta; Gobo-projektiotila; Lämmönhallinta (tuuletinjäähdytteinen); Master/slave-linkitys; Ohjaus mobiilisovelluksella; Moottoroitu kierto; Usean laitteen synkronointi; Musiikkisynkronointi; Ääniaktivoituva tila; Staattinen tila; Strobotila; Ajastin/aikataulutus; Sisältää langattoman kaukosäätimen; Muu
ru: Совместимые функции световых спецэффектов: Регулируемая яркость/диммирование; Регулируемая скорость; Автоматические программы; Режим УФ-подсветки; Встроенный микрофон; Шлейфовое подключение DMX; Шлейфовое подключение питания; Режим проекции гобо; Управление нагревом (с вентилятором); Соединение Master/Slave; Управление через мобильное приложение; Моторизованное вращение; Синхронизация нескольких устройств; Синхронизация с музыкой; Режим звуковой активации; Статический режим; Режим стробоскопа; Таймер/расписание; Беспроводной пульт в комплекте; Другое
ro-RO: Funcții de iluminare compatibile cu efecte speciale: Luminozitate reglabilă/atenuare; Viteză reglabilă; Programe automate; Mod blacklight (lumină UV); Microfon încorporat; Înlănțuire DMX; Înlănțuire a alimentării; Mod proiecție gobo; Gestionarea căldurii (răcire cu ventilator); Conectare master/slave; Control prin aplicația pentru mobil; Rotație motorizată; Sincronizare pentru mai multe unități; Sincronizare cu muzica; Mod activat sonor; Mod static; Mod stroboscop; Temporizator/programator; Telecomandă wireless inclusă; Altele
vi: Các tính năng chiếu sáng hiệu ứng đặc biệt tương thích: Độ sáng/Làm mờ có thể điều chỉnh; Tốc độ có thể điều chỉnh; Các chương trình tự động; Chế độ ánh sáng đen; Micrô tích hợp; Kết nối chuỗi DMX; Kết nối chuỗi nguồn điện; Chế độ chiếu Gobo; Quản lý nhiệt (Làm mát bằng quạt); Liên kết chính/phụ (Master/slave); Điều khiển bằng ứng dụng di động; Xoay bằng động cơ; Đồng bộ hóa nhiều thiết bị; Đồng bộ âm nhạc; Chế độ kích hoạt bằng âm thanh; Chế độ tĩnh; Chế độ chớp nháy; Hẹn giờ/Lên lịch; Kèm điều khiển từ xa không dây; Khác
bg-BG: Съвместими функции за сценично/ефектно осветление: Регулируема яркост/затъмняване; Регулируема скорост; Автоматични програми; Режим черна светлина; Вграден микрофон; Верижно DMX свързване; Верижно захранване; Режим на гобо проекция; Управление на топлината (с вентилатор); Главно/подчинено свързване; Управление чрез мобилно приложение; Моторизирана ротация; Синхронизация на множество устройства; Синхронизация с музика; Режим, активиран от звук; Статичен режим; Стробоскопски режим; Таймер/график; Включено безжично дистанционно управление; Друга
fr: Compatibilité des fonctionnalités d’éclairage à effets spéciaux: Luminosité réglable/gradation; Vitesse réglable; Programmes automatiques; Mode lumière noire; Microphone intégré; DMX en guirlande; Alimentation en guirlande; Mode de projection de gobo; Gestion de la chaleur (refroidissement par ventilateur); Liaison maître/esclave; Contrôle par appli mobile; Rotation motorisée; Synchronisation de plusieurs unités; Synchronisation avec la musique; Mode activé par le son; Mode statique; Mode stroboscope; Minuterie/programmateur; Télécommande sans fil incluse; Autre
hr-HR: Kompatibilne značajke rasvjete za specijalne efekte: Podesiva svjetlina / prigušivanje; Podesiva brzina; Automatski programi; Način crnog svjetla (UV); Ugrađeni mikrofon; Ulančani DMX; Ulančano napajanje; Način gobo projekcije; Upravljanje toplinom (hlađenje ventilatorom); Povezivanje master/slave (glavni/podređeni); Upravljanje mobilnom aplikacijom; Motorizirana rotacija; Sinkronizacija više jedinica; Sinkronizacija s glazbom; Način aktivacije zvukom; Statični način; Stroboskopski način; Mjerač vremena / raspored; Uključen bežični daljinski upravljač; Ostalo
el: Συμβατά χαρακτηριστικά φωτισμού ειδικών εφέ: Ρυθμιζόμενη φωτεινότητα/ντιμάρισμα; Ρυθμιζόμενη ταχύτητα; Αυτόματα προγράμματα; Λειτουργία blacklight; Ενσωματωμένο μικρόφωνο; Αλυσιδωτή σύνδεση (daisy-chain) DMX; Αλυσιδωτή σύνδεση (daisy-chain) ρεύματος; Λειτουργία προβολής Gobo; Διαχείριση θερμότητας (με ανεμιστήρα); Σύνδεση Master/Slave; Έλεγχος μέσω εφαρμογής για κινητά; Μηχανοκίνητη περιστροφή; Συγχρονισμός πολλαπλών μονάδων; Συγχρονισμός με μουσική; Λειτουργία ενεργοποίησης με ήχο; Στατική λειτουργία; Λειτουργία στροβοσκοπίου (strobe); Χρονοδιακόπτης/πρόγραμμα; Περιλαμβάνεται ασύρματο τηλεχειριστήριο; Άλλο
hu: Kompatibilis speciális effektusú világítási funkciók: Állítható fényerő/fényerő-szabályozás; Állítható sebesség; Automatikus programok; Feketefény mód; Beépített mikrofon; Felfűzhető DMX; Felfűzhető tápellátás; Gobo vetítési mód; Hőkezelés (ventilátoros hűtés); Master/slave összekapcsolás; Mobilalkalmazásos vezérlés; Motoros forgatás; Többegységes szinkronizálás; Zenei szinkronizálás; Hangra aktiválódó mód; Statikus mód; Stroboszkóp mód; Időzítő/ütemező; Vezeték nélküli távirányító mellékelve; Egyéb
zh-TW: 相容特效燈功能: 可調亮度/調光; 可調速度; 自動程式; 黑光燈模式; 內建麥克風; 菊鏈 DMX; 菊鏈電源; 圖案片投影模式; 熱能管理 (風扇冷卻); 主/從連結; 行動應用程式控制; 馬達旋轉; 多機同步; 音樂同步; 聲控模式; 靜態模式; 頻閃模式; 計時器/排程器; 隨附無線遙控器; 其他
sk-SK: Kompatibilné funkcie osvetlenia so špeciálnymi efektami: Nastaviteľný jas/stmievanie; Nastaviteľná rýchlosť; Automatické programy; Režim UV svetla; Vstavaný mikrofón; Sériové zapojenie DMX; Sériové napájanie; Režim projekcie Gobo; Odvod tepla (chladené ventilátorom); Prepojenie Master/Slave; Ovládanie prostredníctvom mobilnej aplikácie; Motorizovaná rotácia; Synchronizácia viacerých jednotiek; Synchronizácia s hudbou; Režim aktivovaný zvukom; Statický režim; Stroboskopický režim; Časovač/plánovač; Vrátane bezdrôtového diaľkového ovládania; Iné
cs: Kompatibilní funkce osvětlení pro speciální efekty: Nastavitelný jas/stmívání; Nastavitelná rychlost; Automatické programy; Režim UV světla; Integrovaný mikrofon; Řetězení DMX (daisy-chain); Řetězení napájení (daisy-chain); Režim projekce goba; Řízení teploty (chlazené ventilátorem); Propojení master/slave; Ovládání přes mobilní aplikaci; Motorizovaná rotace; Synchronizace více jednotek; Synchronizace s hudbou; Režim aktivace zvukem; Statický režim; Stroboskopický režim; Časovač/plánovač; Včetně bezdrátového dálkového ovladače; Jiné
ja: 互換性のある特殊効果照明機能: 明るさ調整/調光; 速度調整; オートプログラム; ブラックライトモード; マイク内蔵; DMXデイジーチェーン; 電源デイジーチェーン; ゴボプロジェクションモード; 熱管理 (ファン冷却); マスター/スレーブリンク; モバイルアプリ制御; 電動ローテーション; 複数ユニット同期; ミュージックシンク; サウンドアクティブモード; スタティックモード; ストロボモード; タイマー/スケジューラー; ワイヤレスリモコン付属; その他